Washington statutes.
RCW 15.80.650

Violations—Penalty—Criminal—Civil—Opportunity to request hearing.

(1) Except as provided in RCW 15.80.640 or subsection (2) of this section, any person violating any provision of this chapter or rules adopted hereunder is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(2) A second or subsequent same or similar violation is a gross misdemeanor. Any offense committed more than five years after a previous conviction shall be considered a first offense.

(3) The director may assess a civil penalty ranging from one hundred dollars to one thousand dollars per occurrence against any person who knowingly violates any provision under this chapter or rules adopted thereunder. In determining the amount of any civil penalty, the director shall give due consideration to the appropriateness of the penalty with respect to the gravity of the violation, and the history of any previous violations. The respondent issued a notice of intent to assess a civil penalty must be provided the opportunity to request a hearing as provided under chapter 34.05 RCW to contest the alleged violation and the penalty amount.

[ 2017 c 158 s 14; 2003 c 53 s 109; 1969 ex.s. c 100 s 36.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.